Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2355] University of Hawaii
quasi-endowment trust fund. There is established the University of Hawaii
quasi-endowment trust fund into which shall be deposited income derived from
the university's endowment fund. Income deposited into this account may be
expended by the university as set forth by the board of regents in policies and
guidelines for costs and expenses associated with student financial aid
programs, including scholarships and student support services, awards, and
project opportunities for the university. [L 2015, c 106, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next